Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 76.1 Harassment at Institutions of Higher Education

16-76.1-1.
Internal complaints alleging harassment.

When a student has presented to an institution of higher education an internal complaint alleging harassment on the basis of race or color, religion, sex, disability, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or country of ancestral origin, the institution shall be required to disclose in a timely manner in writing to that student the disposition of the complaint, including a description of any action taken in resolution of the complaint; provided, however, no other personnel information shall be disclosed to the complainant.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 173, § 1.